Massachusetts, session 194th, H4573.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the 
contrary regulating the maximum age of applicants for appointment as firefighter, Sean Duffy of 
the City of Haverhill, shall be eligible for appointment to the position of firefighter in the City if 
he meets all other requirements, in which case he shall be eligible for certification and 
appointment to the fire department of the City of Haverhill. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.